Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 14 Fees and Costs and Security Therefor
§ 1-14-126.
Costs in discretion of court.

In other actions the court may award and tax costs and apportion them between the parties on the same or adverse sides as it deems right and equitable. When a civil case is settled too late for the clerk of court to advise the jury panel that the jurors should not appear on the date summoned the court may order that any or all parties reimburse the proper fund for the fees and mileage paid to the jurors and bailiffs for their appearance.

In civil actions for which an award of attorney’s fees is authorized, the court in its discretion may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party without requiring expert testimony. In exercising its discretion the court may consider the following factors:

The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal service properly;

The likelihood that the acceptance of the particular employment precluded other employment by the lawyer;

The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar legal services;

The amount involved and the results obtained;

The time limitations imposed by the client or by the circumstances;

The nature and length of the professional relationship with the client;

The experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers performing the services; and

Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 358; R.S. 1887, § 2698; R.S. 1899, § 3792; C.S. 1910, § 4647; C.S. 1920, § 5920; R.S. 1931, § 89-2712; C.S. 1945, § 3-3730; W.S. 1957, § 1-223; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1985, ch. 84, § 1; 1992, ch. 39, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to party obligated to pay costs in election contest, see §

22-17-104

.

As to payment of costs of appeal regarding damages in connection with establishment of highways, see §

24-3-121

.

As to payment of costs in hearings and investigations by public service commission, see §

37-2-125

.

As to payment of costs by petitioners upon dismissal of petition in connection with power district, see §

37-7-108

.

As to allowance of premiums for bonds as part of costs, see §

38-2-109

.

Procedure. —

District court did not make a determination on the reasonableness of the client's request for attorney's fees; instead, the record was clear that the district court simply confirmed an agreement between the parties which required the client's ex-husband to make a property distribution to the client to sustain her while she was litigating the divorce. Cotton v. McCulloh, 2005 WY 159, 125 P.3d 252,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2005).

Appellate fees awarded as prevailing party and under lease.
—

In an action to recover rent, a landlord was entitled to appellate attorney's fees under the provisions of the lease contract and pursuant to this provision as prevailing party.
Kinstler v. RTB South Greeley, LTD., LLC, 2007 WY 98, 160 P.3d 1125,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2007), reh'g denied,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. July 17, 2007).

Award reasonable. —

Where borrowers, who were foreclosed on by the bank, argued that the award of contractual based attorney fees should have been limited to 15 percent of the amount of the loan but presented no citation to pertinent authority supporting their theory that the ratio of the amount of the award to the amount of the loan was the determinative factor in establishing the amount of attorney's fees to be awarded, the district court properly held that the fee requested, an award representing 194 percent of the original loan amount, was founded upon a reasonable hourly rate, and properly held that the time expended by the bank's counsel was well documented and that the time was reasonable and necessary given the defenses raised by the borrowers. Askvig v. Wells Fargo Bank, 2005 WY 138, 121 P.3d 783,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(2005).

In an action concerning a breach of a settlement agreement, an award of attorneys'
fees based on the federal lodestar method and this section was upheld as reasonable. The obvious intent of the settlement agreement was to foreclose litigation and to award attorneys'
fees to the prevailing party in any dispute involving the agreement, and the trial court reduced the fees sought by 36 percent.
Morrison v. Clay, 2006 WY 161, 149 P.3d 696,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2006).

When defendant companies sought to develop oil and gas interests, they entered into an agreement with a leaseholder for assignment of leases and for a Net Profits Interest (NPI) in which defendants agreed to pay 5% of the net profits to the leaseholder; in an action to enforce the agreement under the Wyoming Royalty Payment Act (WRPA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

30-5-301

through 305, plaintiffs established their right to the mineral royalty and were entitled to recover attorney fees under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

30-5-303

. The district court did not abuse its discretion by awarding plaintiffs over $ 3.9 million in attorney fees under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b); the district court accepted plaintiffs'
efforts to segregate the non-applicable fees, and the award was reasonable in light to the massive case file and the complexity of the issues.
Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2010 WY 36, 226 P.3d 889,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2010).

Based on Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b), a former member of an LLC was entitled to attorney's fees of $77,470, which was a reasonable amount for a trial, three evidentiary hearings, and four appeals; pursuant to Wyo. R. Civ. P. 1, the court did not remand the action for a determination of fees but made the determination itself based on the unnecessary protraction of the litigation by plaintiff and the LLC.
Thorkildsen v. Belden, 2011 WY 26, 247 P.3d 60,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2011).

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §
1-14-126(b) (2011), the bank's fee application addressed the factors through the attorney's affidavit, and the attached fee statements set forth the fee and cost amounts with sufficient certainty.
Broderick v. Wyo. Cent. Fed. Credit Union, 2012 WY 116, 285 P.3d 941,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2012).

Reasonable fees awarded in workers' compensation claim. —

The Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) properly awarded attorney fees to a workers' compensation claimant's appointed attorney in the claimants appeal of a denial of benefits. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-602(d) does not limit the award of an employee's attorney fees to the “benefits at issue” and there was sufficient evidence in the record to support the determination of the hearing examiner on reasonableness under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b)(i). OAH. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith, 2005 WY 137, 121 P.3d 150,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(2005).

Trial of remonstrances under drainage law was action within section,

so that on finding that remonstrances against confirmation of report were groundless there was nothing unjust in requiring them to pay costs. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Costs to plaintiff. —

In vendor's suit for cancellation of contract for sale of land, in which purchaser also sought cancellation, court, on finding that defendant was in default, was justified in awarding costs to plaintiff, under this section, on granting relief prayed for. Eldridge v. Rogers, 40 Wyo. 89, 275 P. 101,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1929).

Trial court awarded costs to plaintiff who was found 50 percent at fault for her injuries but award was reduced on appeal because plaintiff conceded that the award was too high. Garnick v. Teton County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2002 WY 18, 39 P.3d 1034,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2002).

Costs to prevailing party. —

Defaulted defendant was regarded as the prevailing party and was entitled to award of costs, since plaintiff did not improve her position by the litigation, but defendant improved his position substantially over the result indicated by the entry of default. Schaub v. Wilson, 969 P.2d 552,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1998).

Mandamus proceedings. —

The provision of §

1-31-114

is mandatory and leaves to court no discretion as to taxing costs in mandamus proceedings where judgment must be for defendant. State ex rel. Sampson v. Sheridan, 25 Wyo. 347, 170 P. 1,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1918).

No award of costs to nonindigent defendant acquitted of felony.
—

A trial court has no authority to grant costs to a nonindigent defendant who has been acquitted of a felony. Bernard v. State, 652 P.2d 982,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1982).

No award to firm with conflict of interest. —

In a dispute regarding a subdivision's protective covenants, a law firm representing the homeowners'
association was subject to disqualification under Wyo. R. Prof. Conduct 1.9(a), 1.10(a) because the litigation was substantially related to previous negotiations about the covenants, in which one of the firm's attorneys had represented the owner. Although the district court did not err in denying the disqualification motion as untimely, it should have denied attorney fees as inequitable under this section because the firm had a conflict of interest and had failed to segregate allowable fees from those relating to the disqualification motion.
Magin v. Solitude Homeowner's, Inc., 2011 WY 102, 255 P.3d 920,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2011).

Expenditures must be reasonably required. —

The court has discretion in making the award provided the expenditures are reasonably required for trial preparation. Coulthard v. Cossairt, 803 P.2d 86,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Reasonable necessary deposition expenses reimbursable, but
not expense of preparing enlarged exhibits. —

Reasonable necessary deposition expenses made after the making of a settlement offer, such as those made for depositions relied upon by the court in granting partial summary judgment in favor of the defendant, were properly includable in reimbursable costs. However, the expense of preparing enlarged exhibits for trial was not a taxable cost. Duffy v. Brown, 708 P.2d 433,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 597

(Wyo. 1985).

Burden of demonstrating reasonableness of fees. —

The party seeking to recover attorney's fees bears the burden of demonstrating the reasonableness of the fees, with reasonableness being determined by the district court through the exercise of its sound discretion. In making that decision, the district court can rely on the itemized list and the directions provided by subsection (b) of this section. Russell v. Russell, 948 P.2d 1351,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1997).

Owners did not meet their burden of proof in establishing the reasonableness of their attorney fees under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b) by submitting redacted billing statements along with an offer of in camera review to trial court.
Ringolsby v. Johnson, 2008 WY 127, 193 P.3d 1167,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2008).

Deficient record. —

Where the record was deficient as to the factors articulated in subsection (b), the case was remanded for the purpose of presenting the evidence with respect to the factors set forth in subsection (b). In re Awards of Atty. Fees, 920 P.2d 1245,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1996).

Refusal to award costs to either party

will not be disturbed on appeal unless there is an abuse of discretion. Rutherford v. Lucerne Canal & Power Co., 12 Wyo. 299, 75 P. 445,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1904).

Award summarily reversed on appeal with no remand. —

If a party has had an opportunity to present proof of attorney fees to the trial court, and they fail to do so, the award will be summarily reversed on appeal with no remand. Pekas v. Thompson, 903 P.2d 532,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1995).

A remand to allow additional proof on attorney fees will be allowed only in those instances where a party was denied an opportunity to make proof in the proceeding below. Pekas v. Thompson, 903 P.2d 532,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1995).

Award of attorney fees was summarily reversed where party testified as to the amount he had been charged and that he believed the amount was reasonable, but submitted no itemized billing nor offered any evidence upon which the court could evaluate the reasonableness of the fees. Murphy v. Holman, 945 P.2d 1193,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1997).

No prejudgment interest. —

Award of the debtor's attorney fees was not a liquidated claim, and the debtor was therefore not entitled to prejudgment interest on the award, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b).
Thorkildsen v. Belden, 2012 WY 8, 269 P.3d 421,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Dunnegan, 884 P.2d 35,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 141

, 48 A.L.R.5th 941 (Wyo. 1994); Johnston v. Stephenson, 938 P.2d 861,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1997); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Feb 19, 2014).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mountain Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 11, 269 P.2d 314,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1954); Hashimoto v. Marathon Pipe Line Co., 767 P.2d 158,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1989); Dishman v. First Interstate Bank, 2015 WY 154,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Dec. 8, 2015).

Stated

in

United States ex rel. FHA v. Redland, 695 P.2d 1031,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 450

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994); Rocha v. Rocha, 925 P.2d 231,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1996); Cargile v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 965 P.2d 666,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1998); Gonzales v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 992 P.2d 560,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1999); Bellis v. Kersey, 2010 WY 138, 241 P.3d 818,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Oct. 26, 2010); Ultra Res., Inc. v. Hartman, 2015 WY 40,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Mar. 19, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For comment, “Ethics and the Reasonableness of Contingency Fees: A Survey of State and Federal Law Addressing the Reasonableness of Costs as They Relate to Contingency Fee Arrangements,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 215 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of state or its agency or board for costs in civil action to which it is a party, 72 ALR2d 1379.

Taxation of costs and expenses in proceedings for discovery or inspection, 76 ALR2d 953.

Continuance of civil case as conditioned upon applicant's payment of costs or expenses incurred by other party, 9 ALR4th 1144.

Recoverability from tort-feasor of cost of diagnostic examinations absent proof of actual bodily injury, 46 ALR4th 1151.

Award of attorneys' fees in excess of $75 per hour under Equal
Access to Justice Act (EAJA) provision (28 U.S.C. § 2412(d)(2)(A)(ii)) authorizing higher award—cases involving social security
law,
113 ALR Fed 267.

Award of attorneys' fees in excess of $75 per hour under Equal
Access to Justice Act (EAJA) provision (28 U.S.C. § 2412(d)(2)(A)(ii)) authorizing higher awards—cases involving law other
than social security law,
119 ALR Fed 1.

Federal district court's power to impose sanctions on non-parties for abusing discovery process, 149 ALR Fed 589.

§ 1-14-127.
Recovery of costs when several actions brought on same instrument.

When several actions
are brought on one (1) instrument in writing against several parties
who might have been joined as defendants in the same action, no costs
shall be recovered by the plaintiff in more than one (1) of the actions
if the parties proceeded against in the other action were openly within
the state at the commencement of the previous action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 359; R.S. 1887, § 2699; R.S. 1899, § 3793; C.S. 1910, § 4648; C.S. 1920, § 5921; R.S. 1931, § 89-2713; C.S. 1945, § 3-3731; W.S. 1957, § 1-224; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Section did not bar recovery of costs. —

See United States ex rel. FHA v. Redland, 695 P.2d 1031,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 450

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 1-14-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009,
ch. 168, § 102.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 4, § 1, related to baseless pleadings.

Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.